Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska33-151
Fees of state boards and agencies; amount available for use of each.

All money now in the state treasury to the credit of the Board of Barber Examiners, the State Real Estate Commission, the Board of Engineers and Architects, the State Athletic Commissioner, the Nebraska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission pursuant to sections 57-906 and 57-911, and any other state board, bureau, division, fund, or commission not mentioned in this section, and all money collected by each of such boards, bureaus, divisions, or commissions during any biennium, if and when specifically appropriated by the Legislature for that purpose, are made immediately available for the use and benefit of such board, bureau, division, or commission. This section shall not be construed to apply to the fees inuring to the Nebraska Brand Inspection and Theft Prevention Fund.

Laws 1941, c. 68, § 2, p. 295;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 33-163;

Laws 1943, c. 89, § 1, p. 294;

R.S.1943, § 33-151;

Laws 1945, c. 77, § 1, p. 285;

Laws 1947, c. 126, § 1, p. 365;

Laws 1996, LB 33, § 2;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 2;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 4.